src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON BOAHTIN   !!≈ * **@CODE@**  Intransitiv action nouns from bisyll verbs, long cmp-form
< "+N":0 "@C.NeedNoun@" > BOAHTINsemact ;
 BOAHTIN_dihte ;
 

LEXICON PRE_BOAHTIN   !!≈ * **@CODE@**  Intransitiv action nouns from bisyll verbs, long cmp-form
 @C.NeedNoun@ BOAHTINsemact ;
 BOAHTIN_dihte ;

LEXICON BOAHTINsemact   !!≈ * **@CODE@**  adds Sem/Act
+Sem/Act:   BOAHTINcase ;


LEXICON BOAHTIN_dihte
% dihte+Err/MissingSpace:∑#dihte adv ; !ealáskahttin dihte
% dihte+Err/Orth+Err/MissingSpace:∑#dihti adv ; !ealáskahttin dihte
% dihte+Err/MissingSpace:∑#dihtii adv ; !ealáskahttin dihte
! The following two forms should probably be tagged with +Use/GC, but
! it turns out we remove such forms from the grammar checker generator - I
! don't know why yet, so instead I just don't use it here. It means that the
! analysers will analyse all 'X dihte' and 'X dihtii' sequences as one token.
% dihte:#% dihte adv  ; ! We also need the correct form
% dihte:#% dihtii adv ; ! so that we can generate it as a suggestion



LEXICON BOAHTINSHORT   !!≈ * **@CODE@** Intransitiv action nouns from bisyll verbs, short cmp-form
 +Sem/Act+Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Sem/Act+Cmp/SgNom:%>X7 flagON-R ;
 +Sem/Act+Cmp/SgNom:%> flagOFF-R ;
 +Sem/Act+Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7#viđá K ;
 +Sem/Act+Der+Der/viđi+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7#viđi K ;
 +Sem/Act+Cmp/SgNom:X7# VEARA ;
 +Sem/Act+Ess+Use/NG:%>in K ;   ! Dialects
 +Sem/Act+Ess+Use/NG:%>en K ;   !Dialects
! +Sem/Act+Ess:%>e K ; !not for nouns
 +Sem/Act+Sg+Gen:%>a K ;
 +Sem/Act+Sg+Gen+Allegro: K ;  !
 +Sem/Act+Cmp/SgGen:%>a R ;
 +Sem/Act+Sg+Acc:%>a K ;
!+Sg+Acc: K ; ! We suspect the Acc is never short
 +Sem/Act+Pl+Nom:%>at K ;
 +Sem/Act+Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:%>ak K ; ! !Skániid dialect
 +Sem/Act+Sg+Ill:%>ij K ;
 +Sem/Act+Sg+Loc:%>is K ;
! +Sem/Act+Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:%>in K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sem/Act+Sg+Com:%>ijn K ;
 +Sem/Act+Sg+Com+Err/Orth:%>ijnna K ;
 +Sem/Act+Pl+Gen:%>ijd K ;
 +Sem/Act+Cmp/PlGen:%>ijd R ;
 +Sem/Act+Pl+Acc:%>ijd K ;
 +Sem/Act+Pl+Ill:%>ijdda K ;
 +Sem/Act+Pl+Loc:%>ijn K ;
 +Sem/Act+Pl+Loc+Err/Orth:%>ijnna K ;
 +Sem/Act+Pl+Loc+South+Err/Orth:%>ijs K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sem/Act+Pl+Com:%>ijgujn K ;
 +Sem/Act+Pl+Com/Sh:%>ij∑- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +Sem/Act+Sg+Nom:%> NPx12C  ;
 +Sem/Act+Sg+Gen:%> NPxC ;
 +Sem/Act+Sg+Acc:%> NPxC ;
 +Sem/Act+Sg+Ill:%>asa%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Sem/Act+Sg+Loc:%>istti%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Sem/Act+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:%>isti%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Sem/Act+Sg+Com:%>ijnni%> NPxVvowch ;
! +Sem/Act+Pl+Nom:%>ijddá%> NPx1V ;
! +Pl+Nom:%>ijddi%> NPxVvowch ; !^P^
 +Sem/Act+Pl+Gen:%>ijddi%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Sem/Act+Pl+Acc:%>ijddi%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Sem/Act+Pl+Ill:%>ijddás%> NPxC ;
 +Sem/Act+Pl+Loc:%>ijnni%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Sem/Act+Pl+Com:%>ijddi%> NPxPlComV1 ;


LEXICON IHTAMAT   !!≈ * **@CODE@** Plural action nouns, from bisyllabic verbs
 +Sem/Act+Cmp/SgNom:%> R ;
 +Sem/Act+Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-PLX:#viđá K ;
 +Sem/Act+Der+Der/viđi+Adv+Use/-PLX:#viđi K ;
 +Sem/Act+Cmp/SgNom:# VEARA ;
 +Sem/Act+Ess:%>in K ;
 +Sem/Act+Ess+Use/NG:%>en K ;   !Dialects
 +Sem/Act+Pl+Nom:%>at K ;
 +Sem/Act+Pl+Gen:%>ijd K ;
 +Sem/Act+Cmp/PlGen:%>ijd R ;
 +Sem/Act+Pl+Acc:%>ijd K ;
 +Sem/Act+Pl+Ill:%>ijdda K ;
 +Sem/Act+Pl+Loc:%>ijn K ;
 +Sem/Act+Pl+Loc+Err/Orth:%>ijnna K ;
 +Sem/Act+Pl+Loc+South+Err/Orth:%>ijs K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sem/Act+Pl+Com:%>ijgujn K ;
 +Sem/Act+Pl+Com/Sh:%>ij∑- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
! +Sem/Act+Pl+Nom:%>ijddá%> NPx1V ;
! +Pl+Nom:%>ijddi%> NPxVvowch ; !^P^
 +Sem/Act+Pl+Gen:%>ijddi%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Sem/Act+Pl+Acc:%>ijddi%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Sem/Act+Pl+Ill:%>ijddás%> NPxC ;
 +Sem/Act+Pl+Loc:%>ijnni%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Sem/Act+Pl+Com:%>ijddi%> NPxPlComV1 ;



!!!!!   2e. diminutives

LEXICON LEXDIMINC !!≈ * **@CODE@** diminutives, these comes from noun stems file, from trisyll nouns
! :X4 DIMINC ;
 :%> DIMINC ;






!!   Contracted nouns
!!!!!   1. DEFAULT SECTION
! - - - - - - - ----------

LEXICON BOAZU !!≈ * **@CODE@** Anim. Contracted 0-Nouns. Short compound-forms.
 SUOLU ;

LEXICON SUOLU !!≈ * **@CODE@** Inanim. Contracted 0-Nouns. Short compound-forms.
 :%>X4 BOAZU-NE ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:%>X8 flagON-R ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:%> flagOFF-R ;
 :%>Y5 BOHCCO ;
 :%>Y6 BOHCCU ;
 :%>Y5 DenominalNounsV ;
   DenominalAdjsV1Short ;

LEXICON SUOLULONG !!≈ * **@CODE@** Inanim. Contracted 0-Nouns. Long compound-forms.
 +Sg+Nom:%>X4 K ;
 +Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X4viđá K ;
 +Der+Der/viđi+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X4viđi K ;
 +Ess:%>X4n K ;
 +Ess:%>X4n%> NPxC ;
 +Cmp/SgNom+Err/Orth:%>X5 R ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:%>%^DISIMP R ;
 :%>Y5 BOHCCO ;
 :%>Y6 BOHCCU ;
 :%>Y5 DenominalNounsV ;
   DenominalAdjsV1Long ;



LEXICON FALIS !!≈ * **@CODE@** Contracted Anim. C-Nouns.  Short compound-forms.
 :%>X4 MALIS0 ;
 :%>Y5 FALLA- ;
 :%>Y5 DenominalNounsV ;
   DenominalAdjsV1Short ;

LEXICON LASIS !!≈ * **@CODE@** Contracted Inanim. C-Nouns.  Short compound-forms.
!Tentatively copying entries from FALIS
!This must be checked! 020207 TT.
 :%>X4 MALIS0 ;
! +Cmp/SgNom:%>X7 flagON-R ;
! +Cmp/SgNom:%> flagOFF-R ;
 :%>Y5 FALLA- ;
 :%>Y5 DenominalNounsV ;
   DenominalAdjsV1Short ;





!!   Contracted nouns
!!!!!   2. SPECIAL SECTION:
!!!!!   2a. special lexicas for stray words/isolated occurrences
!!!!!   2b. plural nouns
!       --------------------------------------------------------



!!!!!   2a. special lexicas for stray words/isolated occurrences
!       --------------------------------------------------------


LEXICON GISTTA !!≈ * **@CODE@** The Noun gistta, gist -
 :sºta%>X4 BOAZU-NE ;
 :stá%>Y5 FALLA- ;
 :stá%>Y5 DenominalNounsV ;
 :stta DenominalAdjsV1 ;

LEXICON CEAHKES !!≈ * **@CODE@** only -ceahkes
!Tentatively copying entries from FALIS
!This must be checked! 020207 TT.
 :es%>X4 MALIS0 ;
! +Cmp/SgNom:es%>X7 flagON-R ;
! +Cmp/SgNom:es%> flagOFF-R ;
 :is%>Y5 FALLA- ;
 :is%>Y5 DenominalNounsV ;
 :is DenominalAdjsV1Short ;

LEXICON ALLGUOVT !!≈ * **@CODE@** guovttos guovttis
% guovttis+CmpNP/None:% guo  GUOVTTIS_N ;
% guovttos+CmpNP/None:% gu  GUOVTTU ;
% guovttis+Err/MissingSpace:∑-guo  GUOVTTIS_N ; !?
% guovttos+Err/MissingSpace:∑-gu  GUOVTTU ; !?
% guovttis+Err/MissingSpace:∑#guo  GUOVTTIS_N ;
% guovttos+Err/MissingSpace:∑#gu  GUOVTTU ;


LEXICON GUOVTTIS_N !!≈ * **@CODE@**  only -guovttis
 +v1+N+Coll+Sem/Group_Hum+Sg+Nom:kºtis%>X4 K ;
 +v1+N+Coll+Sem/Group_Hum+Dial/-KJ:kºtis%>X2 MALLAS- ; !XXX tentative
 +v1+N+Coll+Sem/Group_Hum+Ess+Dial/-KJ:vttis%>in K ;
 +v4+N+Coll+Sem/Group_Hum+Sg+Nom:vttes K ;
 +v4+N+Coll+Sem/Group_Hum+Dial/-KJ:kºtis%>X2 MALLAS- ; !XXX tentative
 +v4+N+Coll+Sem/Group_Hum+Ess+Dial/-KJ:vttis%>in K ;
 +v2+N+Coll+Sem/Group_Hum+Sg+Nom:kºtis%>X4 K ;
 +v2+N+Coll+Sem/Group_Hum+Dial/-GG:kºtis%>Y5 FALLA- ;
 +v2+N+Coll+Sem/Group_Hum+Ess+Dial/-KJ:vttis%>in K ;
 +v3+N+Coll+Sem/Group_Hum+Sg+Nom+Dial/-GG:kºtis%>Y5 K ;
 +v3+N+Coll+Sem/Group_Hum+Dial/-GG:kºtis%>Y5 FALLA- ;
 +v3+N+Coll+Sem/Group_Hum+Ess+Dial/-GG:kºtis%>Y5n K ;
