src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NounNoPx   !!= * **@CODE@** here goes nouns not taking Px.
Nillá ALLGUOVT ;
bargoguoimmi ALLGUOVT ;
báhpa ALLGUOVT ;
dánsu ALLGUOVT ;
fáŋgga ALLGUOVT ;
guovttis+CmpNP/None:guo GUOVTTIS_N ;
hoavdda ALLGUOVT ;
miellahtu ALLGUOVT ;
ohcci ALLGUOVT ;
suohkanbáhpa ALLGUOVT ;
turistta% guovttis+Err/MissingSpace:turista∑#guo GUOVTTIS_N ;
vádjoleaddji% guovttis+Err/MissingSpace:vádjoleaddje∑#guo GUOVTTIS_N ;
áššedovdi ALLGUOVT ;
LEXICON NounPx  !!= * **@CODE@** this is the main noun lexicon
beannásárggis+N+Sem/Dummytag:beanná#sárºgis LASIS ;
biekčavuojaš+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Ani:biekča#vuojaž LEXDIMINC ;
bissoolmmoš+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:bisso#olbmož FALIS ;
boatkun+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:boatkum BOAHTIN ;
boazu+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Ani:boahºcu BOAZU "reindeer N" ;
buogu+N+Sem/Dummytag:buohºku SUOLU ;
bálggesbealis+N+Sem/Dummytag:bálgges#beallis LASIS ;
ceahkes+N+Sem/Dummytag:ceahkk CEAHKES ;
deallun+N+Sem/Act+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:deallum BOAHTINSHORT ;
deappu+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+Sem/Plant:deabbu SUOLU ;
dikšun+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:dikšum BOAHTIN ;
dikšunguovddáš+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Plc:dikšun#guovddáž LEXDIMINC ;
doaresbálggis+N+Sem/Route:doares#bálºgis LASIS ;
duogášolmmoš+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:duogáš#olbmož FALIS ;
ealihanboazu+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Ani:ealihan#boahºcu BOAZU ;
eatnanguovlluguovddáš+N+Err/Orth-nom-gen+Sem/Plc:eatnan#guovlu#guovddáž LEXDIMINC ;
energiijaceahkes+N+Sem/Dummytag:energiija#ceahkk CEAHKES ;
energiijamassin+CmpN/SgN:energiija#massim BOAHTIN ;
fuonesriekkis+N+Sem/Dummytag:fuones#rieggis LASIS ;
fáttarboazu+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Ani:fáttar#boahºcu BOAZU ;
geađgerásttis+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Ani:geađge#rásºtis FALIS ;
gielddaguovddáš+N+Err/Orth-nom-gen+Sem/Plc:gielda#guovddáž LEXDIMINC ;
gielu+v1+N+Sem/Dummytag:giellu SUOLU ;	 !OK
gievvun+CmpN/SgN:gievvum BOAHTIN ;
gistta+N+Sem/Clth:gi GISTTA "glove N" ;
goddebálggis+N+Sem/Route:godde#bálºgis LASIS ;
gomu+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Plc:gopmu SUOLULONG ;
gožu+N+Sem/Dummytag:gohºču SUOLULONG ;
guoroláttu+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Plc:guoro#láddu SUOLU ;
gurpagasboazu+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+MWE+Err/SpaceCmp+Sem/Ani:gurpagas% boahºcu BOAZU ;
gálloovddeš+N+Sem/Dummytag:gállo#ovddež LEXDIMINC ;
gánis+v1+N+Sem/Body:gátnis LASIS ; !OK
gávpeboazu+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Ani:gávpe#boahºcu BOAZU ;
hearrásolmmái+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:hearrás#olbmáj FALIS ;
heastadeappu+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+Sem/Plant:heasta#deabbu SUOLU ;
holgaheaŋgán+CmpN/SgN:holga#heaŋgám BOAHTIN ;
johtolatsuolu+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Plc:johtolat#suollu SUOLU ;
kriminálabuletiijaguovddáš+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Plc:kriminála#buletiija#guovddáž LEXDIMINC ;
kulturdoaibman+CmpN/SgN+OLang/NOB:kultur#doaibmam BOAHTIN ;
lámesolmmoš+N+Sem/Hum+Err/Orth:lámis#olbmož FALIS ;
lávgadanriekkis+N+Sem/Dummytag:lávgadan#rieggis LASIS ;
masterdutkan+CmpN/SgN+OLang/UND:master#dutkam BOAHTIN ;
mearrasámegiláš+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Plc:mearra#sáme#giláž LEXDIMINC ;
máttaboazu+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Ani:mátta#boahºcu BOAZU ;
máttaábisuolu+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Plc:mátta#ábi#suollu SUOLU ;
njiedjan+CmpN/SgN:njiedjam BOAHTIN ;
njiŋŋálasmieđaš+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Ani:njiŋŋálas#mieđaž LEXDIMINC ;
njunnefális+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Ani:njunne#fállis FALIS ;
njuovu+N+Sem/Aniprod:njuovvu SUOLULONG ;
njárgaboazu+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Ani:njárga#boahºcu BOAZU ;
nolláčuokkis+N+Sem/Dummytag:nollá#čuoggis LASIS ;
ovdánahttin+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:ovdánahttim BOAHTIN ;
preassaolmmoš+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum_Pos:preassa#olbmož FALIS ;
riikkavuloš+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:riikka#vulož LEXDIMINC ;
ruovdecuoŋu+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Ani:ruovde#cuokŋu SUOLU ;
rádjageassin+CmpN/SgN:rádja#geassim BOAHTIN ;
rádječuokkis+N+Sem/Dummytag:rádje#čuoggis LASIS ;
ráidočaskimat+N+Sem/Event+CmpN/SgN:ráido#časkim IHTAMAT ;
ránesnjuorjju+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Ani:ránes#njuorºju BOAZU ;
skuhtergávpeolmmái+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:skuhter#gávpe#olbmáj FALIS ;
smáhkkabihtáš+N+Sem/Food:smáhkka#bihtáž LEXDIMINC ;
sámeskuvlaolmmái+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:sáme#skuvla#olbmáj FALIS ;
togavuojahallamat+N+Sem/Act+CmpN/SgN:toga#vuojahallam IHTAMAT ;
valástallanriekkis+N+Sem/Org:valástallan#rieggis LASIS ;
varisboazu+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Ani:varis#boahºcu BOAZU ;
veaigeguovssu+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Time:veaige#guokºsu SUOLU ;
vuoiŋŋamašbáidnin+CmpN/SgN:vuoiŋŋamaš#báidnim BOAHTIN ;
vuovdečoavžžu+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Ani:vuovde#čoavºžu BOAZU ;
váhnenolmmoš+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:váhnen#olbmož FALIS ;
áhpecizaš+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Ani:áhpe#cizaž LEXDIMINC ;
árvosátnelohkamat+N+Sem/Act+CmpN/SgN:árvo#sátne#lohkam IHTAMAT ;
ávnnaslohkamat+N+Sem/Edu+CmpN/SgN:ávnnas#lohkam IHTAMAT ;
čiekŋudančuokkis+N+Sem/Dummytag:čiekŋudan#čuoggis LASIS ;
čuoldimat+N+Sem/Act+CmpN/SgN:čuoldim IHTAMAT ;
čáhppesčoavžžu+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Ani:čáhppes#čoavºžu BOAZU ;
šávdasáttu+N+Sem/Substnc:šávda#sáddu SUOLU ;
